test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-klaadd_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - klaaʹdd a-stem tavara: # Noun - full paradigm
     klaaʹdd+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: klaaʹdd
     klaaʹdd+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: klaaʹdd
     klaaʹdd+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: klaaʹdd
     klaaʹdd+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: klaaʹdde
     klaaʹdd+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: klaaʹddest
     klaaʹdd+N+Sg+Com+Indef: klaaʹddin
     klaaʹdd+N+Ess+Indef: klaaʹdden
     klaaʹdd+N+Par+Indef: klaaʹdded
     klaaʹdd+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [klaaʹddtaa, klaaʹddtää]
     klaaʹdd+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: klaaʹdd
     klaaʹdd+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: klaaʹddi
     klaaʹdd+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: klaaʹddid
     klaaʹdd+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: klaaʹddid
     klaaʹdd+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: klaaʹddin
     klaaʹdd+N+Pl+Com+Indef: klaaʹddivuiʹm
     klaaʹdd+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [klaaʹdditaa, klaaʹdditää]
